Massachusetts, session 194th, S1024.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 40B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, after section 21, the following new section:-   
Section 21A. All low or moderate income housing constructed under a comprehensive 
permit must remain affordable in perpetuity. 
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.